Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2215.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 31AGUIDELINES FOR USER AGE VERIFICATION ANDRESPONSIBLE DIALOGUESubchapterA. Preliminary ProvisionsB. Prohibited ConductC. Age VerificationSUBCHAPTER A123456789101112131415161718 PRELIMINARY PROVISIONSSec.31A01. Scope of chapter.31A02. Definitions.§ 31A01. Scope of chapter.This chapter relates to artificial intelligence chatbots and guidelines for user age verification and responsible dialogue.§ 31A02. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Adult." An individual who is 18 years of age or older."Artificial intelligence chatbot" or "AI chatbot." An interactive computer service or software application that:(1) produces new expressive content or responses not fully predetermined by the developer or operator of the service or application;( 2) accepts open-ended natural-language or multimodal user input and produces adaptive or context-responsive output; and(3) does not include an interactive computer service or software application, the responses of which are limited to contextualized replies and are unable to respond on a range of topics outside of a narrow specified purpose."Artificial intelligence companion" or "AI companion." An AI chatbot that:(1) p rovides adaptive, human-like responses to user inputs; and(2) is designed to encourage or facilitate the simulation of interpersonal or emotional interaction, 20260HB2215PN2909 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 friendship, companionship or therapeutic communication."Covered entity." A person that owns, operates or otherwise makes available an AI chatbot to individuals in the United States."Minor." An individual who is under 18 years of age."Reasonable age verification measure." A method that is authenticated to relate to a user of an AI chatbot, including:(1) a government-issued identification; or(2) a ny other commercially reasonable method that: (i) can reliably and accurately determine whether a user is an adult; and(ii) prevents access by minors to AI companions, as required under this chapter."Reasonable age verification process." An age verification process employed by a covered entity that:(1) uses one or more reasonable age verification measures to verify the age of a user of an AI chatbot owned, operated or otherwise made available by the covered entity;(2) p rovides that requiring a user to confirm that the user is not a minor, or to insert the user's birth date, is not sufficient to constitute a reasonable age verification measure;(3) ensures that each user is subjected to each reasonable age verification measure used by the covered entity as part of the age verification process; and(4) does not base verification of a user's age on factors such as whether the user shares an Internet Protocol address, hardware identifier or other technical indicator with another user determined to not be a minor."Sexually explicit conduct." Actual or simulated:20260HB2215PN2909 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) sexual intercourse, including genital-genital, oral-genital, anal-genital or oral-anal, whether between persons of the same or opposite sex;( 2) bestiality; (3) masturbation;(4) sadistic or masochistic abuse; or(5) lascivious exhibition of the genitals or pubic area of any person.SUBCHAPTER BPROHIBITED CONDUCTSec.31A11. Prohibited promotion of sexually explicit conduct.31A12. Prohibited promotion of violence.§ 31A11. Prohibited promotion of sexually explicit conduct.(a) Offense defined.--A person commits an offense if the person designs, develops or makes available an AI chatbot, knowing or with reckless disregard for the fact that the AI chatbot poses a risk of soliciting, encouraging or inducing minors to:(1) engage in, describe or simulate sexually explicit conduct; or(2) create or transmit any visual depiction of sexually explicit conduct.(b) Penalty.--A person who violates subsection (a) shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to pay a fine not exceeding $100,000 per offense.§ 31A12. Prohibited promotion of violence.(a) Offense defined.--A person commits an offense if the person designs, develops or makes available an AI chatbot, knowing or with reckless disregard for the fact that the AI 20260HB2215PN2909 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 chatbot encourages, promotes or coerces suicide, nonsuicidal self-injury or imminent physical or sexual violence.(b) Penalty.--A person who violates subsection (a) shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to pay a fine not exceeding $100,000 per offense.SUBCHAPTER CAGE VERIFICATIONSec.31A21. Creation of user accounts.31A22. Age verification for existing accounts.31A23. Age verification for new accounts.31A24. Review of verified user accounts. 31A25. Use of third party.31A26. Prohibition on minor use of AI companions.31A27. Age verification measure data security.31A28. Enforcement.§ 31A21. Creation of user accounts.A covered entity shall require each individual accessing an AI chatbot to make a user account in order to use or otherwise interact with the AI chatbot.§ 31A22. Age verification for existing accounts. For each user account of an AI chatbot that exists on the effective date of this section, a covered entity shall:(1) On the effective date of this section, freeze each user account.(2) As a condition t o restore the functionality of a user account, require that the user provide age data that is verifiable using a reasonable age verification process, subject to section 31A25 (relating to use of third party).(3) Using the age data provided in accordance with 20260HB2215PN2909 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 paragraph (2), classify each user as a minor or an adult.§ 31A23. Age verification for new accounts. On or after the effective date of this section, at the time that an individual creates a new user account to use or interact with an AI chatbot, a covered entity shall:(1) Request age data from the individual.(2) V erify the individual's age using a reasonable age verification process, subject to section 31A25 (relating to use of third party).(3) Using the age data provided in accordance with paragraph (2), classify each user as a minor or an adult.§ 31A24. Review of verified user accounts. A covered entity shall periodically review previously verified user accounts using a reasonable age verification process, subject to section 31A25 (relating to use of third party), to ensure compliance with this chapter.§ 31A25. Use of third party. (a) Authorization.--For purposes of sections 31A22 (relating to age verification for existing accounts), 31A23 (relating to age verification for new accounts) and 3 1A24 (relating to review of verified user accounts), a covered entity may contract with a third party to employ reasonable age verification measures as part of the covered entity's reasonable age verification process.(b) Effect.--The use of a third party under subsection (a) shall not relieve the covered entity of its obligations under this chapter or from liability under this chapter.§ 31A26. Prohibition on minor use of AI companions.If the age verification process described in this subchapter determines that an individual is a minor, a covered entity shall 20260HB2215PN2909 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 prohibit the minor from accessing or using an AI companion owned, operated or otherwise made available by the covered entity.§ 31A27. Age verification measure data security. A covered entity:(1) Shall develop, implement and maintain reasonable data security for data under this chapter to:(i) Limit the collection of personal data to that which is minimally necessary to verify a user's age or maintain compliance with this chapter.(ii) P rotect age verification data against unauthorized access.(2) Shall protect the integrity and confidentiality of data under this chapter by only transmitting data using industry-standard encryption protocols.(3) Shall retain data under this chapter for no longer than is reasonably necessary to verify a user's age or maintain compliance with this chapter.(4) May not share with, transfer to or sell data under this chapter to any other person or entity.§ 31A28. Enforcement.(a) Civil action.--In the case of a violation under this subchapter, the Attorney General may bring a civil action to:(1) enjoin the violation;(2) e nforce compliance with this subchapter; or (3) obtain civil penalties in accordance with subsection (c), restitution and other appropriate relief.(b) Powers of Office of Attorney General.--(1) For the purpose of conducting investigations or bringing enforcement actions under this subchapter, the 20260HB2215PN2909 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Office of Attorney General may issue subpoenas, administer oaths and compel the production of documents or testimony.( 2) The Office of Attorney General may promulgate regulations necessary to implement, administer and enforce this subchapter.(c) Civil penalties.--(1) A person who violates this subchapter shall be subject to a civil penalty not exceeding $100,000 for each violation.(2) Each violation described in paragraph (1) shall be considered a separate violation.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 180 days.20260HB2215PN2909 - 8 - 123456789101112